Florida, session 2026, SB1090.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 148 149 Section 1.âSection 1001.325, Florida Statutes, is created 150 to read: 151 1001.325âProhibited expenditures.â 152 (1)âA public school, charter school, school district, 153 charter school administrator, or direct-support organization may 154 not expend any funds, regardless of source, to purchase 155 membership in, or goods and services from, any organization that 156 discriminates on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, 157 disability, or religion. 158 (2)âA public school, charter school, school district, 159 charter school administrator, or direct-support organization may 160 not expend any state or federal funds to promote, support, or 161 maintain any programs or campus activities that: 162 (a)âViolate s. 1000.05; or 163 (b)âAdvocate for diversity, equity, and inclusion, or 164 promote or engage in political or social activism, as defined by 165 the State Board of Education. 166 167 Student fees to support student-led organizations are permitted 168 notwithstanding any speech or expressive activity by such 169 organization which would otherwise violate this subsection, 170 provided that the public funds must be allocated to student-led 171 organizations pursuant to written policies or regulations of the 172 school or district in which the student is enrolled, as 173 applicable. Use of school or district facilities by student-led 174 organizations is permitted notwithstanding any speech or 175 expressive activity by such organizations which would otherwise 176 violate this subsection, provided that such use must be granted 177 to student-led organizations pursuant to written policies or 178 regulations of each school or school district, as applicable. 179 (3)âSubsection (2) does not prohibit programs, campus 180 activities, or functions required for compliance with general or 181 federal laws or regulations, for obtaining or retaining 182 accreditation, or for continuing to receive state funds with the 183 approval of either the State Board of Education or the 184 department. 185 (4)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules to 186 implement this section. 187 Section 2.âParagraphs (d) and (i) of subsection (3) of 188 section 1002.20, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 189 1002.20âK-12 student and parent rights.âParents of public 190 school students must receive accurate and timely information 191 regarding their childâs academic progress and must be informed 192 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12 193 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory 194 rights including, but not limited to, the following: 195 (3)âHEALTH ISSUES.â 196 (d)âReproductive health and disease education.âA public 197 school student, only with prior written consent by his or her 198 parent or guardian whose parent makes written request to the 199 school principal, shall be provided instruction in exempted from 200 the teaching of reproductive health or any disease, including 201 HIV/AIDS, in accordance with s. 1003.42(5). 202 1.âEach school district shall, on the districtâs website 203 homepage, notify parents of this right and the process to 204 provide or withhold consent request an exemption. The homepage 205 must include a link for a studentâs parent to access and review 206 the instructional materials, as defined in s. 1006.29(2), used 207 to teach the curriculum. 208 2.âEach school district shall annually review and confirm 209 that the information provided on the districtâs website homepage 210 under subparagraph 1. is accurate and up to date and shall 211 notify parents by physical or electronic means any time 212 revisions are made to such information. 213 (i)âEpinephrine use and supply.â 214 1.âA student who has experienced or is at risk for life 215 threatening allergic reactions may carry an FDA-approved 216 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector and self-administer 217 epinephrine by FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector while 218 in school, participating in school-sponsored activities, or in 219 transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities if the 220 school has been provided with parental and physician 221 authorization. The State Board of Education, in cooperation with 222 the Department of Health, shall adopt rules for such use of FDA 223 approved epinephrine delivery devices which must auto-injectors 224 that shall include provisions to protect the safety of all 225 students from the misuse or abuse of such delivery devices auto 226 injectors. A school district, county health department, public 227 private partner, and their employees and volunteers shall be 228 indemnified by the parent of a student authorized to carry an 229 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injector for any 230 and all liability with respect to the studentâs use of an FDA 231 approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injector pursuant to 232 this paragraph. 233 2.âA public school may purchase a supply of FDA-approved 234 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale 235 distributor as defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an 236 arrangement with a wholesale distributor or manufacturer as 237 defined in s. 499.003 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery 238 devices auto-injectors at fair-market, free, or reduced prices 239 for use in the event a student has an anaphylactic reaction. The 240 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be 241 maintained in a secure location on the public schoolâs premises. 242 The participating school district shall adopt a protocol 243 developed by a licensed physician for the administration by 244 school personnel who are trained to recognize an anaphylactic 245 reaction and to administer an epinephrine by an FDA-approved 246 delivery device auto-injection. The supply of FDA-approved 247 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors may be provided to 248 and used by a student authorized to self-administer epinephrine 249 by FDA-approved delivery device auto-injector under subparagraph 250 1. or trained school personnel. 251 3.âThe school district and its employees, agents, and the 252 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA 253 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not 254 liable for any injury arising from the use of such an 255 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by 256 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and 257 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an 258 anaphylactic reaction: 259 a.âUnless the trained school personnelâs action is willful 260 and wanton; 261 b.âNotwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the 262 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been 263 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging 264 that the school district is not liable; and 265 c.âRegardless of whether authorization has been given by 266 the studentâs parents or guardians or by the studentâs 267 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered 268 nurse. 269 Section 3.âSubsection (17) of section 1002.42, Florida 270 Statutes, is amended to read: 271 1002.42âPrivate schools.â 272 (17)âEPINEPHRINE SUPPLY.â 273 (a)âA private school may purchase a supply of FDA-approved 274 epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors from a wholesale 275 distributor as defined in s. 499.003 or may enter into an 276 arrangement with a wholesale distributor or manufacturer as 277 defined in s. 499.003 for the FDA-approved epinephrine delivery 278 devices auto-injectors at fair-market, free, or reduced prices 279 for use in the event a student has an anaphylactic reaction. The 280 FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors must be 281 maintained in a secure location on the private schoolâs 282 premises. The participating private school shall adopt a 283 protocol developed by a licensed physician for the 284 administration by private school personnel who are trained to 285 recognize an anaphylactic reaction and to administer epinephrine 286 by an FDA-approved epinephrine delivery device auto-injection. 287 The supply of FDA-approved epinephrine delivery devices auto 288 injectors may be provided to and used by a student authorized to 289 self-administer epinephrine by an FDA-approved delivery device 290 auto-injector under s. 1002.20(3)(i) or trained school 291 personnel. 292 (b)âThe private school and its employees, agents, and the 293 physician who provides the standing protocol for school FDA 294 approved epinephrine delivery devices auto-injectors are not 295 liable for any injury arising from the use of an FDA-approved 296 epinephrine delivery device auto-injector administered by 297 trained school personnel who follow the adopted protocol and 298 whose professional opinion is that the student is having an 299 anaphylactic reaction: 300 1.âUnless the trained school personnelâs action is willful 301 and wanton; 302 2.âNotwithstanding that the parents or guardians of the 303 student to whom the epinephrine is administered have not been 304 provided notice or have not signed a statement acknowledging 305 that the school district is not liable; and 306 3.âRegardless of whether authorization has been given by 307 the studentâs parents or guardians or by the studentâs 308 physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered 309 nurse. 310 Section 4.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 311 1002.421, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 312 1002.421âState school choice scholarship program 313 accountability and oversight.â 314 (1)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âA private 315 school participating in an educational scholarship program 316 established pursuant to this chapter must be a private school as 317 defined in s. 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in 318 compliance with all requirements of this section in addition to 319 private school requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific 320 requirements identified within respective scholarship program 321 laws, and other provisions of Florida law that apply to private 322 schools, and must: 323 (i)âMaintain a physical location in the state at which each 324 student has regular and direct contact with teachers. Regular 325 and direct contact with teachers may be satisfied for students 326 enrolled in a personalized education program or for students 327 eligible for a scholarship under s. 1002.394(3)(b) if students 328 have regular and direct contact with teachers at the physical 329 location at least 2 school days per week and the student 330 learning plan addresses the remaining instructional time. 331 332 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private 333 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection, and 334 shall prohibit the school from enrolling new scholarship 335 students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school complies. If a 336 private school fails to meet the requirements of this subsection 337 or has consecutive years of material exceptions listed in the 338 report required under paragraph (q), the commissioner may 339 determine that the private school is ineligible to participate 340 in a scholarship program. 341 Section 5.âSubsection (6) of section 1002.55, Florida 342 Statutes, is amended to read: 343 1002.55âSchool-year prekindergarten program delivered by 344 private prekindergarten providers.â 345 (6)âEach early learning coalition must verify that each 346 private prekindergarten provider delivering the Voluntary 347 Prekindergarten Education Program within the coalitionâs county 348 or multicounty region complies with this part. If a private 349 prekindergarten provider fails or refuses to comply with this 350 part or engages in misconduct, the department shall require the 351 early learning coalition to remove the provider from eligibility 352 to deliver the program and receive state funds under this part 353 for a period of at least 2 program years but no more than 5 354 years. 355 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (10) of section 356 1002.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 357 1002.61âSummer prekindergarten program delivered by public 358 schools and private prekindergarten providers.â 359 (10) 360 (b)âIf a private prekindergarten provider or public school 361 fails or refuses to comply with this part or engages in 362 misconduct, the department shall require the early learning 363 coalition to remove the provider and require the school district 364 to remove the school from eligibility to deliver the Voluntary 365 Prekindergarten Education Program and receive state funds under 366 this part for a period of at least 2 program years but no more 367 than 5 years. 368 Section 7.âParagraph (b) of subsection (9) of section 369 1002.63, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 370 1002.63âSchool-year prekindergarten program delivered by 371 public schools.â 372 (9) 373 (b)âIf a public school fails or refuses to comply with this 374 part or engages in misconduct, the department shall require the 375 school district to remove the school from eligibility to deliver 376 the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program and receive 377 state funds under this part for a period of at least 2 program 378 years but no more than 5 years. 379 Section 8.âSubsection (3), paragraph (e) of subsection (4), 380 paragraphs (a), (c), and (d) of subsection (5), and paragraph 381 (e) of subsection (6) of section 1002.68, Florida Statutes, are 382 amended to read: 383 1002.68âVoluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 384 accountability.â 385 (3)(a)âFor the 2020-2021 program year, the department shall 386 calculate a kindergarten readiness rate for each private 387 prekindergarten provider and public school participating in the 388 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program based upon learning 389 gains and the percentage of students assessed as ready for 390 kindergarten. The department shall require that each school 391 district administer the statewide kindergarten screening in use 392 before the 2021-2022 school year to each kindergarten student in 393 the school district within the first 30 school days of the 2021 394 2022 school year. Private schools may administer the statewide 395 kindergarten screening to each kindergarten student in a private 396 school who was enrolled in the Voluntary Prekindergarten 397 Education Program. Learning gains shall be determined using a 398 value-added measure based on growth demonstrated by the results 399 of the preassessment and postassessment in use before the 2021 400 2022 program year. However, a provider may not be newly placed 401 on probationary status under this paragraph. A provider 402 currently on probationary status may only be removed from such 403 status if the provider earns the minimum rate, determined 404 pursuant to subsection (5). The methodology for calculating a 405 providerâs readiness rate may not include students who are not 406 administered the statewide kindergarten screening. 407 (b)âFor the 2021-2022 program year, kindergarten screening 408 results may not be used in the calculation of readiness rates. 409 Any private prekindergarten provider or public school 410 participating in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 411 which fails to meet the minimum kindergarten readiness rate for 412 the 2021-2022 program year is subject to the probation 413 requirements of subsection (5). 414 (3)(4) 415 (e)âSubject to an appropriation, the department shall 416 provide for a differential payment to a private prekindergarten 417 provider and public school based on the providerâs designation. 418 The maximum differential payment may not exceed a total of 15 419 percent of the base student allocation per full-time equivalent 420 student under s. 1002.71 attending in the consecutive program 421 year for that program. A private prekindergarten provider or 422 public school may not receive a differential payment if it 423 receives a designation of âproficientâ or lower. Before the 424 adoption of the methodology, the department shall confer with 425 the Council for Early Grade Success under s. 1008.2125 before 426 receiving approval from the State Board of Education for the 427 final recommendations on the designation system and differential 428 payments. 429 (4)(a)(5)(a)âIf a public schoolâs or private 430 prekindergarten providerâs program assessment composite score 431 for its prekindergarten classrooms fails to meet the minimum 432 program assessment composite score for contracting adopted in 433 rule by the department, the private prekindergarten provider or 434 public school may not participate in the Voluntary 435 Prekindergarten Education Program beginning in the consecutive 436 program year for a period of 2 program years and thereafter 437 until the public school or private prekindergarten provider 438 meets the minimum composite score for contracting. A public 439 school or private prekindergarten provider may request one 440 program assessment per program year in order to requalify for 441 participation in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 442 Program, provided that the public school or private 443 prekindergarten provider is not excluded from participation 444 under ss. 1002.55(6), 1002.61(10)(b), 1002.63(9)(b), or 445 paragraph (b) (5)(b) of this section. If a public school or 446 private prekindergarten provider would like an additional 447 program assessment completed within the same program year, the 448 public school or private prekindergarten provider shall be 449 responsible for the cost of the program assessment. 450 (c)âA private prekindergarten provider or public school 451 that is placed on probation must continue the corrective actions 452 required under paragraph (b) until the provider or school meets 453 the minimum performance metric or designation adopted by the 454 department. Failure to meet the requirements of subparagraphs 455 (b)1. and 3. shall result in the termination of the providerâs 456 or schoolâs contract to deliver the Voluntary Prekindergarten 457 Education Program for a period of at least 2 program years but 458 no more than 5 years. 459 (d)âIf a private prekindergarten provider or public school 460 remains on probation for 2 consecutive years and fails to meet 461 the minimum performance metric or designation, or is not granted 462 a good cause exemption by the department, the department shall 463 require the early learning coalition to revoke the providerâs 464 eligibility and the school district to revoke the schoolâs 465 eligibility to deliver the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 466 Program and receive state funds for the program for a period of 467 at least 2 program years but no more than 5 years. 468 (5)(6) 469 (e)âA private prekindergarten provider or public school 470 granted a good cause exemption shall continue to implement its 471 improvement plan and continue the corrective actions required 472 under paragraph (4)(b) (5)(b) until the provider or school meets 473 the minimum performance metric. 474 Section 9.âParagraph (m) of subsection (2) of section 475 1002.82, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 476 1002.82âDepartment of Education; powers and duties.â 477 (2)âThe department shall: 478 (m)âProvide technical support to an early learning 479 coalition to facilitate the use of a standard statewide provider 480 contract adopted by the department to be used with each school 481 readiness program provider, with standardized attachments by 482 provider type. The department shall publish a copy of the 483 standard statewide provider contract on its website. The 484 standard statewide contract shall include, at a minimum, 485 contracted slots, if applicable, in accordance with the Child 486 Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014, 45 C.F.R. parts 98 487 and 99; quality improvement strategies, if applicable; program 488 assessment requirements; and provisions for provider probation, 489 termination for cause, and emergency termination for those 490 actions or inactions of a provider that pose an immediate and 491 serious danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the 492 children. The standard statewide provider contract shall also 493 include appropriate due process procedures. During the pendency 494 of an appeal of a termination, the provider may not continue to 495 offer its services. Any provision imposed upon a provider that 496 is inconsistent with, or prohibited by, law is void and 497 unenforceable. Provisions for termination for cause must also 498 include failure to meet the minimum quality measures established 499 under paragraph (n) for a period of 2 up to 5 years, unless the 500 coalition determines that the provider is essential to meeting 501 capacity needs based on the assessment under s. 1002.85(2)(i) 502 and the provider has an active improvement plan pursuant to 503 paragraph (n). 504 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 505 1002.88, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 506 1002.88âSchool readiness program provider standards; 507 eligibility to deliver the school readiness program.â 508 (2)(a)âIf a school readiness program provider fails or 509 refuses to comply with this part or any contractual obligation 510 of the statewide provider contract under s. 1002.82(2)(m), the 511 coalition may revoke the providerâs eligibility to deliver the 512 school readiness program or receive state or federal funds under 513 this chapter for a period of 2 fiscal 5 years. 514 Section 11.âSubsection (5) of section 1002.91, Florida 515 Statutes, is amended to read: 516 1002.91âInvestigations of fraud or overpayment; penalties.â 517 (5)âIf a school readiness program provider or a Voluntary 518 Prekindergarten Education Program provider, or an owner, 519 officer, or director thereof, is convicted of, found guilty of, 520 or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of 521 adjudication, public assistance fraud pursuant to s. 414.39, or 522 is acting as the beneficial owner for someone who has been 523 convicted of, found guilty of, or pleads guilty or nolo 524 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, public assistance 525 fraud pursuant to s. 414.39, the early learning coalition shall 526 refrain from contracting with, or using the services of, that 527 provider for a period of 2 fiscal 5 years. In addition, the 528 coalition must shall refrain from contracting with, or using the 529 services of, any provider that shares an officer or director 530 with a provider that is convicted of, found guilty of, or pleads 531 guilty or nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, public 532 assistance fraud pursuant to s. 414.39 for a period of 2 5 533 years. 534 Section 12.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) and paragraphs 535 (a) and (d) of subsection (4) of section 1002.945, Florida 536 Statutes, are amended to read: 537 1002.945âGold Seal Quality Care Program.â 538 (3) 539 (b)âThe Department of Education shall establish a process 540 that verifies that the accrediting association meets the 541 provisions of paragraph (a), which must include an auditing 542 program and any other procedures that may reasonably determine 543 an accrediting associationâs compliance with this section. If an 544 accrediting association is not in compliance and fails to cure 545 its deficiencies within 30 days, the department shall recommend 546 to the state board termination of the accrediting associationâs 547 participation as an accrediting association in the program for a 548 period of at least 2 years but no more than 5 years. If an 549 accrediting association is removed from being an approved 550 accrediting association, each child care provider accredited by 551 that association shall have up to 1 year to obtain a new 552 accreditation from a department-approved accreditation 553 association. 554 (4)âIn order to obtain and maintain a designation as a Gold 555 Seal Quality Care provider, a child care facility, large family 556 child care home, or family day care home must meet the following 557 additional criteria: 558 (a)âThe child care provider must not have had any class I 559 violations, as defined by rule of the Department of Children and 560 Families, for which the Department of Children and Families 561 determines that the child care provider is the primary cause of 562 the violation within the 2 years preceding its application for 563 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider. Commission of 564 a class I violation for which the Department of Children and 565 Families determines that the child care provider is the primary 566 cause of the violation shall be grounds for termination of the 567 designation as a Gold Seal Quality Care provider until the 568 provider has no class I violations for a period of 2 years. 569 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), if the Department of 570 Education determines through a formal process that a provider 571 has been in business for at least 5 years and has no other class 572 I violations recorded, the department may recommend to the state 573 board that the provider maintain its Gold Seal Quality Care 574 status. The state boardâs determination regarding such 575 providerâs status is final. 576 Section 13.âSubsections (1), (2), and (5) of section 577 1003.42, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 578 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 579 (1)(a)âEach district school board shall provide all courses 580 required for middle grades promotion, high school graduation, 581 and appropriate instruction designed to ensure that students 582 meet State Board of Education adopted standards in the following 583 subject areas: reading and other language arts, mathematics, 584 science, social studies, foreign languages, health and physical 585 education, and the arts. The state board must remove a middle 586 grades course in the Course Code Directory that does not fully 587 integrate all appropriate curricular content required by s. 588 1003.41 and may approve a new course only if it meets the 589 required curricular content. 590 (b)âAll materials used to teach reproductive health or any 591 disease, including HIV/AIDS, its symptoms, development, and 592 treatment, as part of the courses referenced in subsection (5), 593 must be approved by the department. 594 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 595 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 596 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 597 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 598 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 599 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 600 approved methods of instruction, the following: 601 (a)âThe history and content of the Declaration of 602 Independence, including national sovereignty, natural law, self 603 evident truth, equality of all persons, limited government, 604 popular sovereignty, and inalienable rights of life, liberty, 605 and property, and how they form the philosophical foundation of 606 our government. 607 (b)âThe history, meaning, significance, and effect of the 608 provisions of the Constitution of the United States and 609 amendments thereto, with emphasis on each of the 10 amendments 610 that make up the Bill of Rights and how the constitution 611 provides the structure of our government. 612 (c)âThe arguments in support of adopting our republican 613 form of government, as they are embodied in the most important 614 of the Federalist Papers. 615 (d)âFlag education, including proper flag display and flag 616 salute. 617 (e)âThe elements of civil government, including the primary 618 functions of and interrelationships between the Federal 619 Government, the state, and its counties, municipalities, school 620 districts, and special districts. 621 (f)âThe history of the United States, including the period 622 of discovery, early colonies, the War for Independence, the 623 Civil War, the expansion of the United States to its present 624 boundaries, the world wars, and the civil rights movement to the 625 present. American history shall be viewed as factual, not as 626 constructed, shall be viewed as knowable, teachable, and 627 testable, and shall be defined as the creation of a new nation 628 based largely on the universal principles stated in the 629 Declaration of Independence. 630 (g)1.âThe history of the Holocaust (1933-1945), the 631 systematic, planned annihilation of European Jews and other 632 groups by Nazi Germany, a watershed event in the history of 633 humanity, to be taught in a manner that leads to an 634 investigation of human behavior, an understanding of the 635 ramifications of prejudice, racism, and stereotyping, and an 636 examination of what it means to be a responsible and respectful 637 person, for the purposes of encouraging tolerance of diversity 638 in a pluralistic society and for nurturing and protecting 639 democratic values and institutions, including the policy, 640 definition, and historical and current examples of antisemitism, 641 as described in s. 1000.05(8), and the prevention of 642 antisemitism. Each school district must annually certify and 643 provide evidence to the department, in a manner prescribed by 644 the department, that the requirements of this paragraph are met. 645 The department shall prepare and offer standards and curriculum 646 for the instruction required by this paragraph and may seek 647 input from the Commissioner of Educationâs Task Force on 648 Holocaust Education or from any state or nationally recognized 649 Holocaust educational organizations. The department may contract 650 with any state or nationally recognized Holocaust educational 651 organizations to develop training for instructional personnel 652 and grade-appropriate classroom resources to support the 653 developed curriculum. 654 2.âThe second week in November shall be designated as 655 âHolocaust Education Weekâ in this state in recognition that 656 November is the anniversary of Kristallnacht, widely recognized 657 as a precipitating event that led to the Holocaust. 658 (h)âThe history of African Americans, including the history 659 of African peoples before the political conflicts that led to 660 the development of slavery, the passage to America, the 661 enslavement experience, abolition, and the history and 662 contributions of Americans of the African diaspora to society. 663 Students shall develop an understanding of the ramifications of 664 prejudice, racism, and stereotyping on individual freedoms, and 665 examine what it means to be a responsible and respectful person, 666 for the purpose of encouraging tolerance of diversity in a 667 pluralistic society and for nurturing and protecting democratic 668 values and institutions. Instruction shall include the roles and 669 contributions of individuals from all walks of life and their 670 endeavors to learn and thrive throughout history as artists, 671 scientists, educators, businesspeople, influential thinkers, 672 members of the faith community, and political and governmental 673 leaders and the courageous steps they took to fulfill the 674 promise of democracy and unite the nation. Instructional 675 materials shall include the vital contributions of African 676 Americans to build and strengthen American society and celebrate 677 the inspirational stories of African Americans who prospered, 678 even in the most difficult circumstances. Instructional 679 personnel may facilitate discussions and use curricula to 680 address, in an age-appropriate manner, how the individual 681 freedoms of persons have been infringed by slavery, racial 682 oppression, racial segregation, and racial discrimination, as 683 well as topics relating to the enactment and enforcement of laws 684 resulting in racial oppression, racial segregation, and racial 685 discrimination and how recognition of these freedoms has 686 overturned these unjust laws. However, classroom instruction and 687 curriculum may not be used to indoctrinate or persuade students 688 to a particular point of view inconsistent with the principles 689 enumerated in subsection (3) or the state academic standards. 690 Each school district must annually certify and provide evidence 691 to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, 692 that the requirements of this paragraph are met. The department 693 shall prepare and offer standards and curriculum for the 694 instruction required by this paragraph and may seek input from 695 the Commissioner of Educationâs African American History Task 696 Force or from any state or nationally recognized African 697 American educational organizations. The department may contract 698 with any state or nationally recognized African-American 699 educational organizations to develop training for instructional 700 personnel and grade-appropriate classroom resources to support 701 the developed curriculum. 702 (i)âThe history of Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders, 703 including the history of Japanese internment camps and the 704 incarceration of Japanese-Americans during World War II; the 705 immigration, citizenship, civil rights, identity, and culture of 706 Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders; and the contributions of 707 Asian Americans and Pacific Islanders to American society. 708 Instructional materials shall include the contributions of Asian 709 Americans and Pacific Islanders to American society. 710 (j)âThe elementary principles of agriculture. 711 (k)âThe true effects of all alcoholic and intoxicating 712 liquors and beverages and narcotics upon the human body and 713 mind. 714 (l)âKindness to animals. 715 (m)âThe history of the state. 716 (n)âThe conservation of natural resources. 717 (o)âComprehensive age-appropriate and developmentally 718 appropriate K-12 instruction on: 719 1.âHealth education that addresses concepts of community 720 health, consumer health, environmental health, and family life, 721 including: 722 a.âInjury prevention and safety. 723 b.âInternet safety. 724 c.âNutrition. 725 d.âPersonal health. 726 e.âPrevention and control of disease. 727 f.âSubstance use and abuse. 728 g.âPrevention of child sexual abuse, exploitation, and 729 human trafficking. 730 h.âHuman embryologic and fetal development. 731 2.âFor students in grades 7 through 12, teen dating 732 violence and abuse. This component must include, but not be 733 limited to, the definition of dating violence and abuse, the 734 warning signs of dating violence and abusive behavior, the 735 characteristics of healthy relationships, measures to prevent 736 and stop dating violence and abuse, and community resources 737 available to victims of dating violence and abuse. 738 3.âFor students in grades 6 through 12, awareness of the 739 benefits of sexual abstinence as the expected standard and the 740 consequences of teenage pregnancy. 741 4.âLife skills that build confidence, support mental and 742 emotional health, and enable students to overcome challenges, 743 including: 744 a.âSelf-awareness and self-management. 745 b.âResponsible decisionmaking. 746 c.âResiliency. 747 d.âRelationship skills and conflict resolution. 748 e.âUnderstanding and respecting other viewpoints and 749 backgrounds. 750 f.âFor grades 9 through 12, developing leadership skills, 751 interpersonal skills, organization skills, and research skills; 752 creating a rÃ©sumÃ©, including a digital rÃ©sumÃ©; exploring career 753 pathways; using state career planning resources; developing and 754 practicing the skills necessary for employment interviews; 755 workplace ethics and workplace law; managing stress and 756 expectations; and self-motivation. 757 5.a.âFor students in grades 6 through 12, the social, 758 emotional, and physical effects of social media. This component 759 must include, but need not be limited to, the negative effects 760 of social media on mental health, including addiction; the 761 distribution of misinformation on social media; how social media 762 manipulates behavior; the permanency of sharing materials 763 online; how to maintain personal security and identify 764 cyberbullying, predatory behavior, and human trafficking on the 765 Internet; and how to report suspicious behavior encountered on 766 the Internet. 767 b.âThe Department of Education shall make available online 768 the instructional material being used pursuant to this 769 subparagraph, and each district school board shall notify 770 parents of its availability. 771 6.âFor students in grades 6 through 12, health education 772 addressing human embryologic and fetal development, including: 773 a.âA high-definition ultrasound video, at least 1 minute in 774 duration, showing the development of the heart and other organs 775 and movement of the limbs and head; and 776 b.âA high-quality, computer-generated rendering, animation, 777 video, or other multimedia, at least 3 minutes in duration, 778 showing and describing the process of fertilization and various 779 stages of human development inside the uterus, noting 780 significant markers in cell growth and organ development, by 781 week, from conception until birth. 782 783 Health education and life skills instruction and materials may 784 not contradict the principles enumerated in subsection (3). 785 (p)âSuch additional materials, subjects, courses, or fields 786 in such grades as are prescribed by law or by rules of the State 787 Board of Education and the district school board in fulfilling 788 the requirements of law. 789 (q)âThe study of Hispanic contributions to the United 790 States. 791 (r)âThe study of womenâs contributions to the United 792 States. 793 (s)âThe nature and importance of free enterprise to the 794 United States economy. 795 (t)âCivic and character education on the qualities and 796 responsibilities of patriotism and citizenship, including 797 kindness; respect for authority, life, liberty, and personal 798 property; honesty; charity; racial, ethnic, and religious 799 tolerance; and cooperation and, for grades 11 and 12, voting 800 using the uniform primary and general election ballot described 801 in s. 101.151(9). 802 (u)1.âIn order to encourage patriotism, the sacrifices that 803 Medal of Honor recipients have made in serving our country and 804 protecting democratic values worldwide. Such instruction must 805 occur on or before Medal of Honor Day. Members of the 806 instructional staff are encouraged to use the assistance of 807 local veterans and Medal of Honor recipients when practicable. 808 2.âThe history and importance of Veteransâ Day and Memorial 809 Day. Such instruction may include two 45-minute lessons that 810 occur on or before the respective holidays. 811 (v)1.âBeginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the history 812 of communism. Such instruction must be age appropriate and 813 developmentally appropriate and include: 814 a.âThe history of communism in the United States and 815 domestic communist movements, including their histories and 816 tactics. 817 b.âAtrocities committed in foreign countries under the 818 guidance of communism. 819 c.âComparative discussion of political ideologies, such as 820 communism and totalitarianism, which conflict with the 821 principles of freedom and democracy essential to the founding 822 principles of the United States. 823 d.âThe increasing threat of communism in the United States 824 and to our allies through the 20th century, including the events 825 of the Cultural Revolution in the Peopleâs Republic of China and 826 other mass killings from communist regimes. 827 e.âThe economic, industrial, and political events that have 828 preceded and anticipated communist revolutions. 829 f.âThe communist policies of Cuba and the spread of 830 communist ideologies throughout Latin America, including the 831 roots of the Communist Party of Cuba and guerrilla forces 832 throughout Latin America. 833 2.âThe department shall prepare and offer standards for the 834 instruction required by this paragraph and may seek input from 835 any individual who was a victim of communism or any state or 836 nationally recognized organization dedicated to the victims of 837 communism. 838 839 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 840 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 841 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 842 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 843 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 844 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 845 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). The State 846 Board of Education may adopt rules to implement the provisions 847 of this section regarding health education addressing human 848 embryologic and fetal development. 849 (5)âA school district, or a school as defined in s. 850 1003.01, must notify parents and guardians and obtain written 851 consent of a parent or guardian before providing his or her 852 student with instruction on HIV/AIDS and its symptoms, 853 development, and treatment. A student may not participate in 854 such instruction without the prior written consent of his or her 855 parent or guardian. A student whose parent or guardian does not 856 provide such written consent may not be penalized Any student 857 whose parent makes written request to the school principal shall 858 be exempted from the teaching of reproductive health or any 859 disease, including HIV/AIDS, its symptoms, development, and 860 treatment. A student so exempted may not be penalized by reason 861 of that exemption. Course descriptions for comprehensive health 862 education shall not interfere with the local determination of 863 appropriate curriculum that which reflects local values and 864 concerns. Each school district shall, on the districtâs website 865 homepage, notify parents of this right and the process to 866 provide or withhold consent request an exemption. The home page 867 must include a link for a studentâs parent to access and review 868 the instructional materials, as defined in s. 1006.29(2), used 869 to teach the curriculum. 870 Section 14.âSection 1003.4202, Florida Statutes, is created 871 to read: 872 1003.4202âComprehensive system of mathematics instruction.â 873 (1)âEach school district must implement a system of 874 comprehensive mathematics instruction for students enrolled in 875 prekindergarten through grade 12 and students who exhibit a 876 substantial deficiency in early mathematics skills under s. 877 1008.25(6). 878 (2)âEach school district must develop, and submit to the 879 district school board for approval, a detailed mathematics 880 instruction plan that outlines the components of the districtâs 881 comprehensive system of mathematics instruction. The plan must 882 include all district schools, including charter schools, unless 883 a charter school elects to submit a plan independently from the 884 school district. A charter school plan must comply with this 885 section and must be approved by the charter schoolâs governing 886 body and provided to the charter schoolâs sponsor. 887 (3)âComponents of the mathematics instruction plan may 888 include the following: 889 (a)âAdditional time per day of evidence-based intensive 890 mathematics instruction for kindergarten through grade 12 891 students which may be delivered during or outside of the regular 892 school day. 893 (b)âHighly qualified mathematics coaches who hold a grades 894 5-9 mathematics certification or a grades 6-12 mathematics 895 certification and have 3 consecutive years of a highly effective 896 district evaluation, pursuant to s. 1012.34, to support 897 classroom teachers in making instructional decisions based on 898 progress monitoring data collected pursuant to s. 1008.25(8) and 899 improve classroom teacher delivery of effective mathematics 900 instruction and mathematics intervention. 901 (c)âTutoring in mathematics. 902 (4)âEach school district shall submit its approved 903 mathematics instruction plan, including approved mathematics 904 instruction plans for each charter school in the district, to 905 the school board or charter school governing board by August 1 906 of each fiscal year. 907 (5)âFor purposes of this section, the term âevidence-basedâ 908 means demonstrating a statistically significant effect on 909 improving student outcomes or other relevant outcomes as 910 provided in 20 U.S.C. s. 8101(21)(A)(i). 911 Section 15.âSubsection (1) of section 1003.46, Florida 912 Statutes, is amended to read: 913 1003.46âHealth education; instruction in acquired immune 914 deficiency syndrome.â 915 (1)âEach district school board may provide instruction in 916 acquired immune deficiency syndrome education as a specific area 917 of health education. Such instruction may include, but is not 918 limited to, the known modes of transmission, signs and symptoms, 919 risk factors associated with acquired immune deficiency 920 syndrome, and means used to control the spread of acquired 921 immune deficiency syndrome. The instruction shall be appropriate 922 for the grade and age of the student and shall reflect current 923 theory, knowledge, and practice regarding acquired immune 924 deficiency syndrome and its prevention. The district school 925 board must obtain written consent from a studentâs parent or 926 guardian before the student receives instruction. 927 Section 16.âParagraph (f) of subsection (6) of section 928 1006.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 929 1006.07âDistrict school board duties relating to student 930 discipline and school safety.âThe district school board shall 931 provide for the proper accounting for all students, for the 932 attendance and control of students at school, and for proper 933 attention to health, safety, and other matters relating to the 934 welfare of students, including: 935 (6)âSAFETY AND SECURITY BEST PRACTICES.âEach district 936 school superintendent shall establish policies and procedures 937 for the prevention of violence on school grounds, including the 938 assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior 939 poses a threat to the safety of the school community. 940 (f)âSchool safety requirements.âEach school district and 941 charter school governing board shall comply with the following 942 school safety requirements, which apply from 30 minutes before 943 the school start time until 30 minutes after the end of the 944 school day: 945 1.âAll gates or other access points that restrict ingress 946 to or egress from the exclusive zone of a school campus shall 947 remain closed and locked when students are on campus. For the 948 purposes of this section, the term âexclusive zoneâ means the 949 area within a gate or door allowing access to the interior 950 perimeter of a school campus beyond a single point of entry. A 951 gate or access point to the exclusive zone may only be open or 952 unlocked if one of the following conditions is met: 953 a.âIt is attended or actively staffed when students are on 954 campus; 955 b.âThe use complies with a shared use agreement pursuant to 956 s. 1013.101; 957 c.âAnother closed and locked gate or access point separates 958 the open or unlocked gate from areas occupied by students; or 959 d.âThe school safety specialist, or his or her designee, 960 has documented in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool 961 portal maintained by the Office of Safe Schools that the gate or 962 other access point is not subject to this requirement based upon 963 other safety measures at the school. The office may conduct a 964 compliance visit pursuant to s. 1001.212(13) to review if such 965 determination is appropriate. 966 967 This subparagraph does not apply to the nonexclusive zone of a 968 school campus. The term ânonexclusive zoneâ means the area 969 outside of the exclusive zone but contained on school property. 970 Nonexclusive zones may include, but are not limited to, such 971 spaces as parking lots, athletic fields and stadiums, mechanical 972 buildings, playgrounds, bus ramps, agricultural spaces, and 973 other areas that do not give direct, unimpeded access to the 974 exclusive zone. 975 2.a.âAll school classrooms and other instructional spaces 976 must be locked to prevent ingress when occupied by students, 977 except between class periods when students are moving between 978 classrooms or other instructional spaces. If a classroom or 979 other instructional space door must be left unlocked or open for 980 any reason other than between class periods when students are 981 moving between classrooms or other instructional spaces, the 982 door must be actively staffed by a person standing or seated at 983 the door. All school classrooms and other instructional spaces 984 with a permanently installed door lock may also use temporary 985 door locks during an active assailant incident. The temporary 986 door lock must be able to be engaged or removed without opening 987 the door; must be easily removed in a single operation from the 988 egress side of the door without the use of a key and from the 989 ingress side of the door with the use of a key or other 990 credential; may be installed at any height; must otherwise be in 991 compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code; and must be 992 integrated into the active assailant response plan. 993 b.âInstructional spaces for career and technical education 994 which are designed as open areas for which compliance with the 995 requirements of sub-subparagraph a. affects the health and 996 safety of students may be exempted from compliance with that 997 sub-subparagraph by the school safety specialist. To be exempt, 998 the school safety specialist, or his or her designee, must 999 document in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool portal 1000 maintained by the Office of Safe Schools that the instructional 1001 space is exempt from these requirements due to negative impacts 1002 to student health and safety and the presence of other safety 1003 measures at the school that prevent egress from the 1004 instructional space to hallways or other classrooms or 1005 instructional spaces. 1006 c.âCommon areas on a school campus, including, but not 1007 limited to, cafeterias, auditoriums, and media centers, which 1008 are used for instructional time or student testing must meet the 1009 requirements of sub-subparagraph a. only when such areas are 1010 being used for instructional time or student testing. 1011 3.âFor schools that do not have a secure exclusive zone, 1012 all campus access doors, gates, and other access points that 1013 allow ingress to or egress from a school building shall remain 1014 closed and locked at all times to prevent ingress, unless: 1015 a.âA person is actively entering or exiting the door, gate, 1016 or other access point; 1017 b.âThe door, gate, or access point is actively staffed by 1018 school personnel to prevent unauthorized entry; or 1019 c.âThe school safety specialist, or his or her designee, 1020 has documented in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool 1021 portal maintained by the Office of Safe Schools that the open 1022 and unlocked door, gate, or other access point is not subject to 1023 this requirement based upon other safety measures at the school. 1024 There must be at least one locked barrier between classrooms and 1025 instructional spaces and open school campus. 1026 1027 The office may conduct a compliance visit pursuant to s. 1028 1001.212(13) to review if such determination is appropriate. All 1029 campus access doors, gates, and other access points may be 1030 electronically or manually controlled by school personnel to 1031 allow access by authorized visitors, students, and school 1032 personnel. 1033 4.âAll school classrooms and other instructional spaces 1034 must clearly and conspicuously mark the safest areas in each 1035 classroom or other instructional space where students must 1036 shelter in place during an emergency. Students must be notified 1037 of these safe areas within the first 10 days of the school year. 1038 If it is not feasible to clearly and conspicuously mark the 1039 safest areas in a classroom or other instructional space, the 1040 school safety specialist, or his or her designee, must document 1041 such determination in the Florida Safe Schools Assessment Tool 1042 portal maintained by the Office of Safe Schools, identifying 1043 where affected students must shelter in place. The office shall 1044 assist the school safety specialist with compliance during the 1045 inspection required under s. 1001.212(13). 1046 1047 Persons who are aware of a violation of this paragraph must 1048 report the violation to the school principal. The school 1049 principal must report the violation to the school safety 1050 specialist no later than the next business day after receiving 1051 such report. If the person who violated this paragraph is the 1052 school principal or charter school administrator, the report 1053 must be made directly to the district school superintendent or 1054 charter school governing board, as applicable. 1055 Section 17.âPresent subsection (17) of section 1006.38, 1056 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (18), a new 1057 subsection (17) is added to that section, and subsection (15) of 1058 that section is amended, to read: 1059 1006.38âDuties, responsibilities, and requirements of 1060 instructional materials publishers and manufacturers.âThis 1061 section applies to both the state and district approval 1062 processes. Publishers and manufacturers of instructional 1063 materials, or their representatives, shall: 1064 (15)âAccurately and fully disclose only the names of those 1065 persons who actually authored the instructional materials. In 1066 addition to the penalties provided in subsection (18) (17), the 1067 commissioner may remove from the list of state-adopted 1068 instructional materials those instructional materials whose 1069 publisher or manufacturer misleads the purchaser by falsely 1070 representing genuine authorship. 1071 (17)âBe removed from the list of state-adopted 1072 instructional materials for a period not to exceed 5 years, if 1073 the commissioner determines that a publisher or manufacturer has 1074 violated any provision of the law relating to the content, 1075 marketing, sale, distribution, or furnishing of instructional 1076 materials, or any requirement of this part. The commissioner 1077 also may, in his or her discretion, remove that publisherâs or 1078 manufacturerâs eligibility to offer instructional materials for 1079 state adoption for a period not to exceed 5 years. 1080 (a)âBefore action under this subsection, the department 1081 must provide written notice identifying the alleged violation 1082 and afford the publisher or manufacturer at least 15 business 1083 days to submit a written response and any proposed corrective 1084 action. The commissioner may shorten this timeframe if student 1085 safety or an immediate violation of law is implicated. 1086 (b)âAs a condition of continued eligibility or 1087 reinstatement, the commissioner may require corrective actions, 1088 including revision or replacement of materials at no cost to the 1089 state or districts, training, or other remediation the 1090 department prescribes. 1091 (c)âAction taken under this subsection is in addition to, 1092 and does not limit, any other remedies available under this 1093 part, including removal of materials under s. 1006.35(3) and 1094 other applicable penalties. 1095 Section 18.âSubsections (1) and (5) of section 1006.39, 1096 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1097 1006.39âProduction and dissemination of educational 1098 materials and products by department.â 1099 (1)âEducational materials and products developed by or 1100 under the direction of the department, through research and 1101 development or other efforts, including those subject to 1102 copyright, patent, or trademark, shall be made available for use 1103 by school districts, teachers, students, administrators, and 1104 other appropriate persons in the state system of education at 1105 the earliest practicable date and in the most economical and 1106 efficient manner possible. 1107 (5)âA school district may purchase instructional materials 1108 developed by or under the direction of the department at any 1109 time during which the state academic standards for which the 1110 materials are aligned is in effect. Such purchases may be used 1111 by a district to meet the expenditure requirements for 1112 instructional materials that must be purchased from the state 1113 adopted list as provided in s. 1006.40 The department shall not 1114 enter into the business of producing or publishing instructional 1115 materials for general use in classrooms. 1116 Section 19.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) and paragraph 1117 (a) of subsection (9) of section 1008.25, Florida Statutes, are 1118 amended to read: 1119 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 1120 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 1121 requirements.â 1122 (5)âREADING DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.â 1123 (b)âA Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program student 1124 who exhibits a substantial deficiency in early literacy skills 1125 based upon the results of the administration of the midyear or 1126 final coordinated screening and progress monitoring under 1127 subsection (9) shall be referred to the local school district 1128 and may be eligible to receive instruction in early literacy 1129 skills before participating in kindergarten. A Voluntary 1130 Prekindergarten Education Program student who scores below the 1131 25th 10th percentile on the final administration of the 1132 coordinated screening and progress monitoring under subsection 1133 (9) shall be referred to the local school district and is 1134 eligible to receive early literacy skill instructional support 1135 through a summer bridge program the summer before participating 1136 in kindergarten. The summer bridge program must meet 1137 requirements adopted by the department and shall consist of 4 1138 hours of instruction per day for a minimum of 100 total hours. A 1139 student with an individual education plan who has been retained 1140 pursuant to paragraph (2)(g) and has demonstrated a substantial 1141 deficiency in early literacy skills must receive instruction in 1142 early literacy skills. 1143 (9)âCOORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.â 1144 (a)âThe Department of Education, in collaboration with the 1145 Office of Early Learning, shall procure and require the use of a 1146 statewide, standardized coordinated screening and progress 1147 monitoring system for the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1148 Program and public schools. The system must: 1149 1.âMeasure student progress in meeting the appropriate 1150 expectations in early literacy and mathematics skills and in 1151 English Language Arts and mathematics standards as required by 1152 ss. 1002.67(1)(a) and 1003.41 and identify the educational 1153 strengths and needs of students. 1154 2.âFor students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1155 Program through grade 3, measure student performance in oral 1156 language development, phonological and phonemic awareness, 1157 knowledge of print and letters, decoding, fluency, vocabulary, 1158 and comprehension, as applicable by grade level, and, at a 1159 minimum, provide interval level and norm-referenced data that 1160 measures equivalent levels of growth. 1161 3.âBe a valid, reliable, and developmentally appropriate 1162 computer-based direct instrument that provides screening and 1163 diagnostic capabilities for monitoring student progress; 1164 identifies students who have a substantial deficiency in reading 1165 or mathematics, including identifying students with 1166 characteristics of dyslexia, dyscalculia, and other learning 1167 disorders; and informs instruction. Any student identified by 1168 the system as having characteristics of dyslexia or dyscalculia 1169 shall undergo further screening. Beginning with the 2023-2024 1170 school year, the coordinated screening and progress monitoring 1171 system must be computer-adaptive. 1172 4.âProvide data for Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 1173 Program accountability as required under s. 1002.68. 1174 5.âProvide Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 1175 providers, school districts, schools, teachers, and parents with 1176 data and resources that enhance differentiated instruction and 1177 parent communication. 1178 6.âProvide baseline data to the department of each 1179 studentâs readiness for kindergarten. The determination of 1180 kindergarten readiness must be based on the results of each 1181 studentâs initial progress monitoring assessment in 1182 kindergarten. The methodology for determining a studentâs 1183 readiness for kindergarten must be developed by the department 1184 and aligned to the methodology adopted pursuant to s. 1002.68(3) 1185 s. 1002.68(4). 1186 7.âAssess how well educational goals and curricular 1187 standards are met at the provider, school, district, and state 1188 levels and provide information to the department to aid in the 1189 development of educational programs, policies, and supports for 1190 providers, districts, and schools. 1191 Section 20.âSubsection (5) of section 1008.33, Florida 1192 Statutes, is amended to read: 1193 1008.33âAuthority to enforce public school improvement.â 1194 (5)âThe Department of Education shall annually identify 1195 each public school district in need of intervention and support 1196 to improve student academic performance. 1197 (a)âA school district is deemed in need of intervention and 1198 support if it has 10 percent or more district-operated schools 1199 that earn a grade of D or F under s. 1008.34. 1200 (b)âA school district in need of intervention and support 1201 must annually submit a district improvement plan in a format 1202 prescribed by the department. The plan must include provisions 1203 to improve and monitor, at a minimum, instructional staffing; 1204 professional learning; fiscal and staffing resources dedicated 1205 to school improvement; student scheduling, attendance, and 1206 behavior; and the use of continuous improvement and monitoring 1207 plans and processes. The plan must be approved by the local 1208 school board and may be reviewed by the state board for approval 1209 or denial. District superintendents may be called before the 1210 state board to provide implementation updates. 1211 (c)âA school district in need of intervention and support 1212 must submit to the department, as part of the implementation of 1213 the district improvement plan, at least all of the following 1214 information: 1215 1.âMonthly vacancy reports for instructional personnel at 1216 schools earning a grade of D or F. 1217 2.âMonthly teacher absenteeism reports for schools earning 1218 a grade of D or F. 1219 3.âMonthly student absenteeism reports for schools earning 1220 a grade of D or F. 1221 4.âMonthly professional learning, activities, and 1222 expenditures for instructional staff at schools earning a grade 1223 of D or F. 1224 5.âMonthly professional learning, activities, and 1225 expenditures for school administrators at schools earning a 1226 grade of D or F. 1227 6.âLocal progress monitoring results that are not part of 1228 the statewide progress monitoring system. 1229 (d)âThe state board may require modifications to or revoke 1230 the district improvement plan if the district does not provide 1231 evidence of implementing the plan or submit deliverables in the 1232 prescribed format or timeframe or if the plan is not showing 1233 evidence of producing significant district-wide improvement. 1234 (e)âThe state board shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 1235 120.536(1) and 120.54 to administer this section. The rules 1236 shall include timelines for submission of implementation plans, 1237 approval criteria for implementation plans, timelines for 1238 implementing intervention and support strategies, a standard 1239 charter school turnaround contract, a standard facility lease, 1240 and a mutual management agreement. The state board shall consult 1241 with education stakeholders in developing the rules. 1242 Section 21.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1), subsection 1243 (6), paragraph (b) of subsection (7), and subsection (9) of 1244 section 1012.56, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1245 1012.56âEducator certification requirements.â 1246 (1)âAPPLICATION.âEach person seeking certification pursuant 1247 to this chapter shall submit a completed application containing 1248 the applicantâs social security number to the Department of 1249 Education and remit the fee required pursuant to s. 1012.59 and 1250 rules of the State Board of Education. Pursuant to the federal 1251 Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act 1252 of 1996, each party is required to provide his or her social 1253 security number in accordance with this section. Disclosure of 1254 social security numbers obtained through this requirement is 1255 limited to the purpose of administration of the Title IV-D 1256 program of the Social Security Act for child support 1257 enforcement. 1258 (b)âThe department shall issue a temporary certificate to a 1259 qualifying applicant within 14 calendar days after receipt of a 1260 request from an employer with a professional education 1261 competence demonstration program pursuant to paragraph (6)(f) 1262 and subsection (9). The temporary certificate must cover the 1263 classification, level, and area for which the applicant is 1264 deemed qualified. The department shall electronically notify the 1265 applicantâs employer that the temporary certificate has been 1266 issued and provide the applicant an official statement of status 1267 of eligibility at the time the certificate is issued. 1268 1269 The statement of status of eligibility must be provided 1270 electronically and must advise the applicant of any 1271 qualifications that must be completed to qualify for 1272 certification. Each method by which an applicant can complete 1273 the qualifications for a professional certificate must be 1274 included in the statement of status of eligibility. Each 1275 statement of status of eligibility is valid for 5 years after 1276 its date of issuance, except as provided in paragraph (2)(d). 1277 (6)âMASTERY OF PROFESSIONAL PREPARATION AND EDUCATION 1278 COMPETENCE.âAcceptable means of demonstrating mastery of 1279 professional preparation and education competence are: 1280 (a)âSuccessful completion of an approved teacher 1281 preparation program at a postsecondary educational institution 1282 within this state and achievement of a passing score on the 1283 professional education competency examination required by state 1284 board rule; 1285 (b)âSuccessful completion of a teacher preparation program 1286 at a postsecondary educational institution outside Florida and 1287 achievement of a passing score on the professional education 1288 competency examination required by state board rule; 1289 (c)âDocumentation of a valid professional standard teaching 1290 certificate issued by another state; 1291 (d)âDocumentation of a valid certificate issued by the 1292 National Board for Professional Teaching Standards or a national 1293 educator credentialing board approved by the State Board of 1294 Education; 1295 (e)âDocumentation of two semesters of successful, full-time 1296 or part-time teaching in a Florida College System institution, 1297 state university, or private college or university that awards 1298 an associate or higher degree and is an accredited institution 1299 or an institution of higher education identified by the 1300 Department of Education as having a quality program and 1301 achievement of a passing score on the professional education 1302 competency examination required by state board rule; 1303 (f)âSuccessful completion of professional preparation 1304 courses as specified in state board rule, successful completion 1305 of a professional education competence program pursuant to 1306 subsection (9), and documentation of 3 years of being rated 1307 effective or highly effective under s. 1012.34 while holding a 1308 temporary certificate; 1309 (g)âSuccessful completion of a professional learning 1310 certification program, outlined in subsection (8); or 1311 (g)(h)âSuccessful completion of a competency-based 1312 certification program pursuant to s. 1004.85 and achievement of 1313 a passing score on the professional education competency 1314 examination required by rule of the State Board of Education. 1315 1316 The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to implement this 1317 subsection, including rules to approve specific teacher 1318 preparation programs that are not identified in this subsection 1319 which may be used to meet requirements for mastery of 1320 professional preparation and education competence. 1321 (7)âTYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.â 1322 (b)âBeginning July 1, 2026, the department shall issue a 1323 temporary certificate to any applicant who: 1324 1.âCompletes the requirements outlined in paragraphs 1325 (2)(a)-(f) and completes the subject area content requirements 1326 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject 1327 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5) and holds an 1328 accredited degree or a degree approved by the Department of 1329 Education at the level required for the subject area 1330 specialization in state board rule; 1331 2.âFor a subject area specialization for which the state 1332 board otherwise requires a bachelorâs degree, documents 48 1333 months of active-duty military service with an honorable 1334 discharge or a medical separation; completes the requirements 1335 outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(f); completes the 1336 subject area content requirements specified in state board rule 1337 or demonstrates mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to 1338 subsection (5); and documents completion of 60 college credits 1339 with a minimum cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 1340 scale, as provided by one or more accredited institutions of 1341 higher learning or a nonaccredited institution of higher 1342 learning identified by the Department of Education as having a 1343 quality program resulting in a bachelorâs degree or higher; or 1344 3.âIs enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation 1345 program under s. 1004.04; is actively completing the required 1346 program field experience or internship at a public school; 1347 completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), 1348 and (d)-(f); completes the subject area content requirements 1349 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject 1350 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); and documents 1351 completion of 60 college credits with a minimum cumulative grade 1352 point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as provided by one or more 1353 accredited institutions of higher learning or a nonaccredited 1354 institution of higher learning identified by the Department of 1355 Education as having a quality program resulting in a bachelorâs 1356 degree or higher. 1357 1358 At least 1 year before an individualâs temporary certificate is 1359 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the 1360 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will 1361 expire and provide a list of each method by which the 1362 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed. 1363 (9)âPROFESSIONAL EDUCATION COMPETENCY PROGRAM.â 1364 (a)âEach school district must and a private school or 1365 state-supported public school, including a charter school, may 1366 develop and maintain a program system by which members of the 1367 instructional staff may demonstrate mastery of professional 1368 preparation and education competence as required by law. The 1369 professional education competency program must: 1370 1.âBe based on classroom application of the Florida 1371 Educator Accomplished Practices and instructional performance 1372 and, for public schools, must be aligned with the districtâs or 1373 state-supported public schoolâs evaluation system established 1374 under s. 1012.34, as applicable. 1375 2.âInclude an individualized plan tailored to each 1376 candidate to determine the appropriate professional learning 1377 plan. 1378 3.âMonitor candidate performance to ensure candidates are 1379 meeting program expectations and implement a remediation process 1380 for candidates not meeting program performance expectations. 1381 4.âAssign candidates to a mentor who meets the requirements 1382 of paragraph (7)(e). 1383 (b)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules to 1384 determine the initial and continued approval of programs 1385 implemented under this subsection Each program must be based on 1386 classroom application of the Florida Educator Accomplished 1387 Practices and instructional performance and, for public schools, 1388 must be aligned with the districtâs or state-supported public 1389 schoolâs evaluation system established under s. 1012.34, as 1390 applicable. 1391 (b)âThe Commissioner of Education shall determine the 1392 continued approval of programs implemented under this paragraph, 1393 based upon the departmentâs review of performance data. The 1394 department shall review the performance data as a part of the 1395 periodic review of each school districtâs professional learning 1396 system required under s. 1012.98. 1397 Section 22.âParagraphs (d) and (f) of subsection (1) of 1398 section 1014.05, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1399 1014.05âSchool district notifications on parental rights.â 1400 (1)âEach district school board shall, in consultation with 1401 parents, teachers, and administrators, develop and adopt a 1402 policy to promote parental involvement in the public school 1403 system. Such policy must include: 1404 (d)âProcedures, pursuant to s. 1002.20(3)(d), for a parent 1405 to provide or withhold consent for his or her minor child to 1406 participate in withdraw his or her minor child from any portion 1407 of the school districtâs comprehensive health education required 1408 under s. 1003.42(2)(o) that relates to sex education or 1409 instruction on reproductive health or any disease, including 1410 HIV/AIDS in acquired immune deficiency syndrome education or any 1411 instruction regarding sexuality if the parent provides a written 1412 objection to his or her minor childâs participation. Such 1413 procedures must provide for a parent to be notified in advance 1414 of such course content so that he or she may provide or withdraw 1415 his or her minor child from those portions of the course. 1416 (f)âProcedures for a parent to learn about parental rights 1417 and responsibilities under general law, including all of the 1418 following: 1419 1.âPursuant to s. 1002.20(3)(d), the right to be notified 1420 in advance and to provide or withhold consent before his or her 1421 minor child participates in opt his or her minor child out of 1422 any portion of the school districtâs instruction on reproductive 1423 health or any disease, including HIV/AIDS comprehensive health 1424 education required under s. 1003.42(2)(o) that relates to sex 1425 education instruction in acquired immune deficiency syndrome 1426 education or any instruction regarding sexuality. 1427 2.âA plan to disseminate information, pursuant to s. 1428 1002.20(6), about school choice options, including open 1429 enrollment. 1430 3.âIn accordance with s. 1002.20(3)(b), the right of a 1431 parent to exempt his or her minor child from immunizations. 1432 4.âIn accordance with s. 1008.22, the right of a parent to 1433 review statewide, standardized assessment results. 1434 5.âIn accordance with s. 1003.57, the right of a parent to 1435 enroll his or her minor child in gifted or special education 1436 programs. 1437 6.âIn accordance with s. 1006.28(2)(a)1., the right of a 1438 parent to inspect school district instructional materials. 1439 7.âIn accordance with s. 1008.25, the right of a parent to 1440 access information relating to the school districtâs policies 1441 for promotion or retention, including high school graduation 1442 requirements. 1443 8.âIn accordance with s. 1002.20(14), the right of a parent 1444 to receive a school report card and be informed of his or her 1445 minor childâs attendance requirements. 1446 9.âIn accordance with s. 1002.23, the right of a parent to 1447 access information relating to the state public education 1448 system, state standards, report card requirements, attendance 1449 requirements, and instructional materials requirements. 1450 10.âIn accordance with s. 1002.23(4), the right of a parent 1451 to participate in parent-teacher associations and organizations 1452 that are sanctioned by a district school board or the Department 1453 of Education. 1454 11.âIn accordance with s. 1002.222(1)(a), the right of a 1455 parent to opt out of any district-level data collection relating 1456 to his or her minor child not required by law. 1457 Section 23.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1458 1008.2125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1459 1008.2125âThe Council for Early Grade Success.â 1460 (1)âThe Council for Early Grade Success, a council as 1461 defined in s. 20.03(7), is created within the Department of 1462 Education to oversee the coordinated screening and progress 1463 monitoring program under s. 1008.25(9) for students in the 1464 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program through grade 3 and, 1465 except as otherwise provided in this section, shall operate 1466 consistent with s. 20.052. 1467 (a)âThe council shall be responsible for reviewing the 1468 implementation of, training for, and outcomes from the 1469 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program to provide 1470 recommendations to the department that support grade 3 students 1471 reading at or above grade level. The council, at a minimum, 1472 shall: 1473 1.âProvide recommendations on the implementation of the 1474 coordinated screening and progress monitoring program, including 1475 reviewing any procurement solicitation documents and criteria 1476 before being published. 1477 2.âDevelop training plans and timelines for such training. 1478 3.âIdentify appropriate personnel, processes, and 1479 procedures required for the administration of the coordinated 1480 screening and progress monitoring program. 1481 4.âProvide input on the methodology for calculating a 1482 providerâs or schoolâs performance metric and designations under 1483 s. 1002.68(3) s. 1002.68(4). 1484 5.âWork with the department to review the methodology for 1485 determining a childâs kindergarten readiness. 1486 6.âReview data on age-appropriate learning gains by grade 1487 level that a student would need to attain in order to 1488 demonstrate proficiency in reading by grade 3. 1489 7.âContinually review anonymized data from the results of 1490 the coordinated screening and progress monitoring program for 1491 students in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 1492 through grade 3 to help inform recommendations to the department 1493 that support practices that will enable grade 3 students to read 1494 at or above grade level. 1495 Section 24.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.